Alaska, session 34, HB181.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 08.18.071(b) is amended to read: 04 (b) The amount of the bond for a 05 (1) general contractor shall be $25,000; 06 (2) general contractor with a residential contractor endorsement under 07 AS 08.18.025 who performs exclusively residential work shall be $20,000; 08 (3) mechanical or specialty contractor or home inspector shall be 09 $10,000; or 10 (4) contractor whose work on one project with an aggregate contract 11 price of $20,000 [$10,000] or less, including all labor, materials, and other items, 12 when the work is not part of a larger or major operation or otherwise divided into 13 contracts of less than $20,000 [$10,000] to evade a higher bonding requirement, shall 14 be $10,000 [$5,000]. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.